Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 13 Radiation Control

Administrative rules and regulations.

X-Ray, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-22.

Laser radiation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-27.

Radioactive materials, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Chapter 391-3-17.

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 amendment of Code sections within this chapter, see 7 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 304 (1990).

31-13-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Radiation Control Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1301, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-2.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the environment and the public health and safety of its citizens and, to the extent authorized under Article VI, Section 2 of the Constitution of the United States:

To institute and maintain programs to allow development and utilization of sources of radiation for purposes that are consistent with the protection of the environment and the health and safety of the public; and

To prevent any associated harmful effects of radiation upon the environment or the health and safety of the public through the institution and maintenance of regulatory programs for radiation sources, providing for:

Compatibility with the standards and regulatory programs of the federal government for by-product, source, and special nuclear materials;

An effective system of regulations within the state consistent with this chapter and with any environmental laws, rules, regulations, standards, or limitations; and

A system consonant insofar as possible with those of other states.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1302, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Accelerator produced radioactive material” means any material made radioactive by a particle accelerator.

(1.1)

“By-product material” means any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in or made radioactive by exposure to the radiation incident to the process of producing or utilizing special nuclear material.

(1.2)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Director” means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

“General license” means a license effective pursuant to applicable rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, without the filing of an application, to transfer, acquire, own, possess, or use quantities of by-product, source, or special nuclear materials, or other radioactive material occurring naturally or produced artificially or devices, radiation generating equipment, or equipment utilizing such materials.

“Ionizing radiation” means gamma rays and X-rays, alpha and beta particles, high-speed electrons, protons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles; but not sound or radio waves or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light.

(4.1)

“Naturally occurring radioactive material” means radioactive material occurring naturally in the environment.

(4.2)

“Nonionizing radiation” means:

Any electromagnetic radiation other than ionizing electromagnetic radiation; or

Any sonic, ultrasonic, or infrasonic wave.

“Permissible radiation exposure” means the maximum amount of radiation to which an individual may be exposed, as established in applicable standards adopted by the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, trust, estate, public or private institution, agency or political subdivision of this state, or any other state or political subdivision or agency thereof.

“Radiation” means gamma rays and X-rays, alpha and beta particles, high-speed electrons, protons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles, and electromagnetic radiation consisting of associated and interacting electric and magnetic waves with frequencies between 1x109 hertz and 1x1024 hertz and wavelengths between 3x10-1 meters and 3x10-16 meters.

“Radiation generating equipment” means any manufactured product or device, or component part of such a product or device, or any machine or system which during operation can generate or emit radiation, except those which emit radiation only from radioactive material.

“Radioactive material” means any solid, liquid, or gas for any use that emits ionizing radiation spontaneously. It includes accelerator produced, by-product, naturally occurring, source, and special nuclear material.

(9.1)

“Registration” means registration with either the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources in accordance with applicable rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

“Source material” means (A) uranium, thorium, and any other material which the Department of Natural Resources declares to be source material after the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material to be such; or (B) ores containing one or more of the foregoing materials, in such concentration as the Department of Natural Resources declares to be source material after the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material in such concentration to be source material.

“Special nuclear material” means (A) plutonium, uranium 233, uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in the isotope 235, and any other material which the Department of Natural Resources declares to be special nuclear material after the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material to be such, but does not include source material; or (B) any material artificially enriched by any of the foregoing, but does not include source material.

“Specific license” means a license, issued after application, to use, manufacture, produce, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess quantities of by-product, source, or special nuclear materials, or other radioactive material occurring naturally or produced artificially, or devices or equipment utilizing such materials.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1303, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-15/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was inserted following “Natural Resources” in paragraph (3).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-13-4.
Administration of state-wide radiation control program for radiation generating equipment.

The Department of Community Health is designated the state agency to administer a state-wide radiation control program for radiation generating equipment consistent with this chapter and any environmental laws, rules, regulations, standards, or limitations administered by the Department of Natural Resources. It is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly that no provision of this chapter shall be construed so as to repeal, supersede, or preempt any of the functions, powers, authority, duties, or responsibilities assigned to the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources under this chapter or any other laws or statutes of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1304, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of director as to hazardous waste, §

12-8-65

.

31-13-4.1.
Administration of state-wide radiation control program for radioactive materials.

The Department of Natural Resources is designated the state agency to administer a state-wide radiation control program for radioactive materials consistent with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-5.
Powers and duties of Department of Community Health and Department of Natural Resources; enforcement of chapter through inspection; training programs.

For the protection of the public health and safety, the Department of Community Health, with regard to radiation generating equipment, and the Department of Natural Resources, with regard to radioactive materials, are empowered to:

Develop comprehensive policies and programs for the evaluation, determination, and amelioration of hazards associated with the use of radiation. Such policies and programs shall be developed with due regard for compatibility with federal programs;

Advise, consult, and cooperate with other public agencies and with affected groups and industries;

Encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, public hearings, training, research, and demonstrations relating to the control of sources of radiation, the effect upon public health and safety of exposure to radiation, and related problems;

Adopt, promulgate, amend, and repeal such rules, regulations, and standards which may provide for licensing or registration relating to the distribution, assembly, manufacture, production, transportation, use, handling, storage, disposal, sale, lease, or other disposition of radioactive material and radiation generating equipment as may be necessary to carry out this chapter, provided that prior to adoption of any regulation or standard, or amendment or repeal thereof, the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, as is appropriate, shall afford interested parties an opportunity, at a public hearing conducted as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title, to submit data or views orally or in writing. The recommendations of nationally recognized bodies in the field of radiation protection shall be taken into consideration when formulating standards relative to the permissible dosage of radiation;

Issue, modify, or revoke orders, in connection with proceedings under this chapter, prohibiting or abating the discharge of radiation and radioactive material or waste into the ground, air, or waters of the state, except that the Department of Natural Resources shall not prohibit discharges expressly permitted by the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission or any successor agency;

Require the submission of plans, specifications, and reports for new construction and material alterations on (A) the design and protective shielding of installations for radioactive material and radiation generating equipment; and (B) systems for the disposal of radioactive waste materials and for the determination of any radiation hazard; and render opinions, approve, or disapprove such plans and specifications;

Require all sources of radiation to be shielded, transported, handled, used, stored, or disposed of in such a manner to provide compliance with this chapter and rules, regulations, and standards adopted pursuant to this chapter;

Collect and disseminate information relating to the control of sources of radiation, including but not limited to (A) maintenance of a file of all license applications, issuances, denials, amendments, transfers, renewals, modifications, suspensions, and revocations; and (B) maintenance of a file of registrants possessing sources of radiation requiring registration under this chapter, regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and any administrative or judicial action pertaining thereto;

Exempt certain sources of radiation or kinds of uses or users from the licensing or registration requirements set forth in this chapter when the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, as is applicable, determines that the exemption of such sources of radiation or kinds of uses or users will not constitute a significant risk to the health and safety of the public;

Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter which may provide for recognition of other state and federal licenses as the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources shall deem desirable, subject to such registration requirements as may be prescribed by the applicable department; and

Exercise all incidental powers necessary to administer this chapter.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Natural Resources are authorized to enter upon any public or private property at all reasonable times for the purpose of determining compliance with applicable provisions of this chapter and rules, regulations, and standards adopted pursuant to this chapter.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Natural Resources are authorized to enter into appropriate agreements with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, whereby this state will perform, on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, inspections and other functions related to the control of radiation.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Natural Resources are authorized to institute appropriate training programs for the purpose of qualifying personnel to administer applicable provisions of this chapter and may make such personnel available for participation in any programs of the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-1306, 88-1308, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979).

31-13-6.
Bonding licensees.

The Department of Natural Resources may require the posting of a bond not to exceed $5 million by an existing general or specific licensee by amendment to an existing license or by a person making an application for a new general or specific license, in order to assure the availability of funds to the state in the event of abandonment, insolvency, or other inability of a licensee to meet the requirements of the Department of Natural Resources for the safe collection and disposition of sources of ionizing radiation from radioactive material in the event of an accident, discontinuance of operation, or any circumstance which results in a potential radiation hazard at a site occupied by the licensee or formerly under its possession, ownership, or control. The Department of Natural Resources is authorized to establish, by rule or regulation, the bonding requirements by classes of licensees and by range of monetary amounts not to exceed $5 million. In establishing such requirements, the Department of Natural Resources shall give due consideration to the probable extent of contamination, the amount of possible property damage, the costs of removal and disposal of radioactive material used by the licensee, and the costs of reclamation of the property in the event of abandonment, insolvency, or other inability of the licensee to perform such services to the satisfaction of the Department of Natural Resources; provided, however, that a bond not less than $5 million shall be required for any licensee offering commercial radiation sterilization services, excluding hospitals, blood banks, and physicians’ offices.

The Department of Natural Resources shall have authority upon finding that conditions under this Code section have not been met or when it determines that an imminent hazard to the public health and welfare exists to require forfeiture of the bond and use the money therefrom to take any action deemed necessary to protect the public health and welfare.

A licensee who abandons a site or facility without taking the required actions to meet the requirements of the Department of Natural Resources shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any bonding or financial protection requirements established by the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to this Code section shall not apply to the state or any agency of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1059, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1411, § 1.

31-13-7.
Permits for disposal of radioactive waste; bonding of permittees.

No person shall construct or operate a site or other facility for the concentration, storage, or burial of radioactive waste without first securing a permit for such construction or operation from the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources. The director, under the conditions he prescribes, may require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as he deems relevant in connection with the issuance of such permit. The director may issue a permit for the construction or operation of such a site or other facility upon a determination that the construction or operation would be consistent with the purposes and stated policy of this chapter. Any permit which may be issued by the director shall specify the conditions under which the site or facility shall be operated. The director, in specifying such conditions, shall have the power and authority to require a permittee to establish and maintain records; to make reports; to install, maintain, and use monitoring equipment or methods including, but not limited to, biological monitoring methods or emission and ambient monitoring devices; to sample any emission or discharge in accordance with such methods, at such locations, at such intervals, and in such manner as the director shall prescribe; and to provide such other information as he may reasonably require. Any permit issued shall be subject to periodic review; and the director may revoke or modify any permit if the holder fails to comply with any conditions thereof. The director is authorized to adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate, after due notice and public hearing held in accordance with and established pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” rules and regulations not inconsistent with this Code section, for purposes of administering this Code section.

The director may require the posting of a bond by the proposed permittee or operator, payable to the state, as a condition of any permit, in order to assure the availability of funds to the state in the event of abandonment, insolvency, or other inability of a permittee to meet the requirements of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources for the safe collection and disposition of sources of ionizing radiation in the event of an accident, discontinuance of operation, or any circumstance which results in a potential radiation hazard at a site or facility for the concentration, storage, or burial of radioactive waste, which site is occupied by the permittee or was formerly under its possession, ownership, or control. The Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources is authorized to establish, by rule or regulation, the bonding requirements of permittees by range of monetary amounts. In establishing such requirements, the director of the Environmental Protection Division shall give due consideration to the probable extent of contamination, the amount of possible property damage, the costs of removal and disposal of sources of radiation used by the permittee, and the costs of reclamation of the property in the event of abandonment, insolvency, or other inability of the permittee to perform such services to the satisfaction of the director. The director shall have authority upon finding that conditions under this Code section have not been met or when he determines that an imminent hazard to the public health and welfare exists to require forfeiture of bond and use the money therefrom to take any action deemed necessary to protect the public health and welfare. A permittee who abandons a site or facility without taking the required actions to meet the requirements of the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any bonding or financial protection requirements established by the director pursuant to this Code section shall not apply to the state, or any agency of the state, or to the storage of spent fuel possessed under 10 CFR Part 50 or Part 70, which fuel was generated at an electric generating utilization facility and which is stored at such utilization facility in facilities licensed under 10 CFR Part 50 or at another such in-state utilization facility in facilities licensed under 10 CFR Part 50.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1306.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 1152, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 6; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1059, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

Cross references.

Hazardous waste management, §

12-8-60

et seq.

31-13-8.
Licensing users of by-product, source, and special nuclear materials as sources of ionizing radiation.

The Governor, on behalf of this state, is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuance of certain responsibilities of the federal government with respect to sources of ionizing radiation and the assumption of such responsibilities by this state.

Upon the signing of the contract as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Department of Natural Resources shall provide by rule or regulation for general or specific licensing of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess by-product, source, or special nuclear materials or devices, installations, or equipment utilizing such materials. Such rule or regulation shall provide for amendment, suspension, or revocation of licenses. Each application for a specific license shall be in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Natural Resources and shall state such information and be accompanied by such documents, including, but not limited to, plans, specifications, and reports for new construction or material alterations, as the Department of Natural Resources may determine to be reasonable and necessary to decide the qualifications of the applicant to protect the public health and safety. The Department of Natural Resources may require any applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the Department of Natural Resources may deem necessary. No license issued under the authority of this chapter and no right to possess or utilize sources of ionizing radiation granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and the terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revision, or modification by rules, regulations, or orders issued in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1307, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-8.1.
General or specific licensing for use, manufacture, transport, transactions in, and possession of radioactive material.

The Department of Natural Resources shall establish, manage, and administer a program for the general or specific licensing of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess radioactive material including by-product, source, or special nuclear materials or devices, installations, or equipment utilizing such materials, including the promulgation of such rules and regulations as the Board of Natural Resources may deem necessary to implement and enforce the program.
Such rules or regulations shall provide for amendment, suspension, or revocation of licenses. Each application for a specific license shall be in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Natural Resources and shall state such information and be accompanied by such documents, including, but not limited to, plans, specifications, and reports for new construction or material alterations, as the Department of Natural Resources may determine to be reasonable and necessary to decide the qualifications of the applicant to protect the public health and safety. The Department of Natural Resources may require any applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the Department of Natural Resources may deem necessary.
No license issued under the authority of this chapter and no right to possess or utilize sources of ionizing radiation granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and the terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revision, or modification by rules, regulations, or orders issued in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-8.2.
Licensing of diagnostic and therapeutic medical uses of radioactive materials.

The Department of Community Health is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the registration and periodic renewal of registration of persons to sell, distribute, assemble, use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess radiation generating equipment. Such rule or regulation shall provide for suspension or revocation of registration.
Each application for registration shall be in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Community Health and shall state such information and be accompanied by such documents, including, but not limited to, plans, specifications, and reports for new construction or material alterations, as the Department of Community Health may determine to be reasonable and necessary to decide the qualifications of the applicant to protect the public health and safety.
The Department of Community Health may require any applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. No registration issued under the authority of this chapter and no right to possess or utilize radiation generating equipment granted by any registration shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of without prior notification to the Department of Community Health.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-13-8.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 4; Code 1981, §

31-13-8.2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, repealed former Code Section 31-13-8.2, concerning licensing of diagnostic and therapeutic medical uses of radioactive materials, which was based on Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 4.

31-13-9.
Records of use of radiation sources and exposure of employees to radiation.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Natural Resources are authorized to require, in accordance with applicable provisions of this chapter, each person who possesses or uses a source of radiation (1) to maintain appropriate records relating to its receipt, storage, use, transfer, or disposal and to maintain such other records as the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, as is applicable, may require, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by rules and regulations; and (2) to maintain appropriate records showing the radiation exposure of all individuals for whom personnel monitoring may be required by the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, as is applicable, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by rules and regulations. Copies of all records required to be kept by this subsection shall be submitted to the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources, as is appropriate, or the duly authorized agents of such department upon request.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Natural Resources are authorized to require, in accordance with applicable provisions of this chapter, any person possessing or using a source of radiation to furnish, at the request of any employee for whom personnel monitoring is required, a copy of such employee’s personal exposure record annually, upon termination of employment, and at any time such employee has received excessive exposure.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1309, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-13-10.
Suspension, revocation, and amendment of license or registration; emergency orders; review.

The Department of Natural Resources may refuse to grant a license as provided in Code Section 31-13-8 or 31-13-8.1 and the Department of Community Health may refuse to register radiation generating equipment as provided in Code Section 31-13-8.2 to any applicant who does not possess the applicable requirements or qualifications which the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, as applicable, may prescribe in rules and regulations. The Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health may suspend, revoke, or amend any license or registration, respectively, in the event the person to whom such license or registration was granted violates any of the rules and regulations of the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, whichever is applicable, or ceases or fails to have the reasonable facilities prescribed by the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, provided that, before any order is entered denying an application for a license or registration or suspending, revoking, or amending a license or registration previously granted, the applicant or person to whom such license or registration was granted shall be given notice and granted a hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

Whenever the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health finds that an emergency exists involving any licensee or registrant requiring immediate action to protect the public health and safety, the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, as is appropriate, may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such emergency and requiring that such action be taken as is necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter, such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but on application to the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, as is appropriate, shall be afforded a hearing within ten days. On the basis of such hearing, the emergency order shall be continued, modified, or revoked within 30 days after such hearing, as the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, as is appropriate, may deem appropriate under the evidence.

Any applicant or person to whom a license or registration was granted who is aggrieved by any order of the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health or the duly authorized agent of such department denying any such application or suspending, revoking, or amending such license or registration may file a hearing request with the appropriate agency to contest such action pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1310, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, punctuation changes were made at the end of subsection (c).

31-13-11.
Impounding and condemnation of radiation generating equipment and radioactive materials.

In the event of an emergency, the Department of Community Health shall have the authority to impound or order the impounding of radiation generating equipment in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

The Department of Community Health may release such radiation generating equipment to the owner thereof upon terms and conditions in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or may bring an action in the appropriate superior court for an order condemning such radiation generating equipment and providing for its destruction or other disposition so as to protect the public health and safety.

In the event of an emergency, the Department of Natural Resources shall have the authority to impound or order the impounding of radioactive materials in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

The Department of Natural Resources may release such radioactive materials to the owner thereof upon terms and conditions in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or may bring an action in the appropriate superior court for an order condemning such radioactive materials and providing for their destruction or other disposition so as to protect the public health and safety.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1311, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-13-12.
License required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, assemble, distribute, produce, transport, receive, acquire, own, or possess any source of radiation required to be licensed or registered under this chapter unless licensed by or registered with the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, respectively, in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1312, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, § 6; Code 1981, §

31-13-14

; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1670, § 6; Code 1981, §

31-13-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, repealed former Code Section 31-13-12, concerning prohibited uses of radiation sources, which was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 920, § 6, and redesignated former Code Section 31-13-14 as present Code Section 31-13-12.

31-13-13.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of Code Section 31-13-7 or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to such Code section, or who violates the provisions of Code Section 31-13-12, or who hinders, obstructs, or otherwise interferes with any representative of the Department of Community Health or the Department of Natural Resources in the discharge of his official duties in making inspections as provided in Code Section 31-13-5 or in impounding materials as provided in Code Section 31-13-11 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who:

Violates any licensing or registration provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration certificate under this chapter; or

Commits any violation for which a license or registration certificate may be revoked under rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter

may be subject to a civil penalty, to be imposed by the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Health, as is applicable, not to exceed $10,000.00.
If any violation is a continuing one, each day of such violation shall constitute a separate violation for the purpose of computing the applicable civil penalty.

Whenever the Department of Community Health proposes to subject a person to the imposition of a civil penalty under this subsection, it shall notify such person in writing:

Setting forth the date, facts, and nature of each act or omission with which the person is charged;

Specifically identifying the particular provision or provisions of the Code section, rule, regulation, order, license, or registration certificate involved in the violation; and

Advising of each penalty which the Department of Community Health proposes to impose and its amount.

Such written notice shall be sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery by the Department of Community Health to the last known address of such person. The person so notified shall be granted an opportunity to show in writing, within such reasonable period as the Department of Community Health shall by rule or regulation prescribe, why such penalty should not be imposed.
The notice shall also advise such person that, upon failure to pay the civil penalty, if any, subsequently determined by the Department of Community Health, the penalty may be collected by civil action.
Any person upon whom a civil penalty is imposed may contest such action in an administrative hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

On the request of the Department of Community Health, the Attorney General is authorized to institute a civil action to collect a penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection. The Attorney General shall have the exclusive power to compromise, mitigate, or remit such civil penalties as are referred to him for collection.

All moneys collected from civil penalties shall be paid to the state for deposit in the general fund.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1313, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 8; Code 1981, §

31-13-15

; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1428, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-13-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, repealed former Code Section 31-13-13, concerning penalties, which was based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 1567, § 8, and redesignated former Code Section 31-13-15 as present Code Section 31-13-13.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that subparagraph (b)(2)(C) of this Code section was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

31-13-14.
Inspections and investigations.

The director or his duly authorized representatives shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspection and investigation of conditions relating to the handling of radioactive materials in the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 31-13-14 as present Code Section 31-13-12.

31-13-15.
Investigation of apparent violations; initiation of legal proceedings.

The director shall have the authority to investigate any apparent violation of this chapter and to take any action authorized under this chapter as he deems necessary and may institute proceedings of mandamus or other proper legal proceedings to enforce this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 31-13-15 as present Code Section 31-13-13.